src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
    allýsa+V+Inf: allýsa
    allýsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: allýsir
    allýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: allýstu
    allýsa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: allýsti
    allýsa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: allýstur
    allýsa+V+Sup: allýst
    aloyða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: aloyðir
    aloyða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: aloyddu
    aloyða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: aloyddi
    aloyða+V+Inf: aloyða
    aloyða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: aloyddur
    aloyða+V+Sup: aloytt
    ana+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: anir
    ana+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: andu
    ana+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: andi
    ana+V+Inf: ana
    ana+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: andur
    ana+V+Sup: ant
    andrøða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: andrøðir
    andrøða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: andrøddu
    andrøða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: andrøddi
    andrøða+V+Inf: andrøða
    andrøða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: andrøddur
    andrøða+V+Sup: andrøtt
    andstevna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: andstevnir
    andstevna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: andstevndu
    andstevna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: andstevndi
    andstevna+V+Inf: andstevna
    andstevna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: andstevndur
    andstevna+V+Sup: andstevnt
    andstøða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [andstøðar, andstøðir]
    andstøða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [andstøddu, andstøðaðu]
    andstøða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [andstøddi, andstøðaði]
    andstøða+V+Inf: andstøða
    andstøða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [andstøddur, andstøðaður]
    andstøða+V+Sup: [andstøtt, andstøðað]
    andøva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: andøvir
    andøva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: andøvdu
    andøva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: andøvdi
    andøva+V+Inf: andøva
    andøva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: andøvdur
    andøva+V+Sup: andøvt
    arbeiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: arbeiðir
    arbeiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: arbeiddu
    arbeiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: arbeiddi
    arbeiða+V+Inf: arbeiða
    arbeiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: arbeiddur
    arbeiða+V+Sup: arbeitt
    atkvøða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: atkvøðir
    atkvøða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: atkvøddu
    atkvøða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: atkvøddi
    atkvøða+V+Inf: atkvøða
    atkvøða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: atkvøddur
    atkvøða+V+Sup: atkvøtt
    avdøma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avdømir
    avdøma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avdømdu
    avdøma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: avdømdi
    avdøma+V+Inf: avdøma
    avdøma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: avdømdur
    avdøma+V+Sup: avdømt
    avegna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avegnir
    avegna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avegndu
    avegna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: avegndi
    avegna+V+Inf: avegna
    avegna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: avegndur
    avegna+V+Sup: avegnt
    avferma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avfermir
    avferma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avfermdu
    avferma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: avfermdi
    avferma+V+Inf: avferma
    avferma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: avfermdur
    avferma+V+Sup: avfermt
    avgreiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avgreiðir
    avgreiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avgreiddu
    avgreiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: avgreiddi
    avgreiða+V+Inf: avgreiða
    avgreiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: avgreiddur
    avgreiða+V+Sup: avgreitt
    avhenda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [avhendar, avhendir]
    avhenda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [avhendaðu, avhendu]
    avhenda+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [avhendaði, avhendi]
    avhenda+V+Inf: avhenda
    avhenda+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [avhendaður, avhendur]
    avhenda+V+Sup: [avhendað, avhent]
    avhoyra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avhoyrir
    avhoyra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avhoyrdu
    avhoyra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: avhoyrdi
    avhoyra+V+Inf: avhoyra
    avhoyra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: avhoyrdur
    avhoyra+V+Sup: avhoyrt
    avloysa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avloysir
    avloysa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avloystu
    avloysa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: avloysti
    avloysa+V+Inf: avloysa
    avloysa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: avloystur
    avloysa+V+Sup: avloyst
    avlýsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avlýsir
    avlýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avlýstu
    avlýsa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: avlýsti
    avlýsa+V+Inf: avlýsa
    avlýsa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: avlýstur
    avlýsa+V+Sup: avlýst
    avoyða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avoyðir
    avoyða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avoyddu
    avoyða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: avoyddi
    avoyða+V+Inf: avoyða
    avoyða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: avoyddur
    avoyða+V+Sup: avoytt
    avreiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avreiðir
    avreiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avreiddu
    avreiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: avreiddi
    avreiða+V+Inf: avreiða
    avreiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: avreiddur
    avreiða+V+Sup: avreitt
    avskøða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: avskøðir
    avskøða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: avskøddu
    avskøða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: avskøddi
    avskøða+V+Inf: avskøða
    avskøða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: avskøddur
    avskøða+V+Sup: avskøtt
    avtapa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [avtapar, avtapir]
    avtapa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [avtapaðu, avtaptu]
    avtapa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [avtapaði, avtapti]
    avtapa+V+Inf: avtapa
    avtapa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [avtapaður, avtaptur]
    avtapa+V+Sup: [avtapað, avtapt]
    baga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bagir
    baga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bagdu
    baga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bagdi
    baga+V+Inf: baga
    baga+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bagdur
    baga+V+Sup: bagt
    bannføra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bannførir
    bannføra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bannførdu
    bannføra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bannførdi
    bannføra+V+Inf: bannføra
    bannføra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bannførdur
    bannføra+V+Sup: bannført
    bannlýsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bannlýsir
    bannlýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bannlýstu
    bannlýsa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bannlýsti
    bannlýsa+V+Inf: bannlýsa
    bannlýsa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bannlýstur
    bannlýsa+V+Sup: bannlýst
    basa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [basar, basir]
    basa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [basaðu, bastu]
    basa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [basaði, basti]
    basa+V+Inf: basa
    basa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [basaður, bastur]
    basa+V+Sup: [basað, bast]
    begynna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: begynnir
    begynna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: begyntu
    begynna+V+Inf: begynna
    begynna+V+Sup: begynt
    beina+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: beindi
    beina+V+Inf: beina
    beina+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: beindur
    beina+V+Sup: beint
    beita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: beitir
    beita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: beittu
    beita+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: beitti
    beita+V+Inf: beita
    beita+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: beittur
    beita+V+Sup: beitt
    beiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: beiðir
    beiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: beiddu
    beiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: beiddi
    beiða+V+Inf: beiða
    beiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: beiddur
    beiða+V+Sup: beitt
    bekla+V+Inf: bekla
    belgja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: belgir
    belgja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: belgdu
    belgja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: belgdi
    belgja+V+Inf: belgja
    belgja+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: belgdur
    belgja+V+Sup: belgt
    benda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bendir
    benda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bendu
    benda+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bendi
    benda+V+Inf: benda
    benda+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bendur
    benda+V+Sup: bent
    bera+V+Inf: bera
    berja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bardu
    berja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bardi
    berja+V+Inf: berja
    berja+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bardur
    berja+V+Sup: bart
    berka+V+Inf: berka
    bertelva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [bertelvar, bertelvir]
    bertelva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [bertelvaðu, bertelvdu]
    bertelva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [bertelvaði, bertelvdi]
    bertelva+V+Inf: bertelva
    bertelva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [bertelvaður, bertelvdur]
    bertelva+V+Sup: [bertelvað, bertelvt]
    bestilla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bestillir
    bestilla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bestiltu
    bestilla+V+Inf: bestilla
    bestilla+V+Sup: bestilt
    betala+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: betalir
    betala+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: betaltu
    betala+V+Inf: betala
    betala+V+Sup: betalt
    binda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bindur
    binda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bundu
    binda+V+Inf: binda
    binda+V+Sup: bundið
    birgja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: birgir
    birgja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: birgdu
    birgja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: birgdi
    birgja+V+Inf: birgja
    birgja+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: birgdur
    birgja+V+Sup: birgt
    birta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: birtir
    birta+V+Inf: birta
    birta+V+Sup: birt
    bjóða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [býður, bjóðar]
    bjóða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [beyð, bjóðaði]
    bjóða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [buðu, bjóðaðu]
    bjóða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [boðin, bjóðaður]
    bjóða+V+Sup: [boðið, bjóðað]
    bjóða+V+Inf: bjóða
    blaðskoyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: blaðskoytir
    blaðskoyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: blaðskoyttu
    blaðskoyta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: blaðskoytti
    blaðskoyta+V+Inf: blaðskoyta
    blaðskoyta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: blaðskoyttur
    blaðskoyta+V+Sup: blaðskoytt
    bloyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bloytir
    bloyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bloyttu
    bloyta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bloytti
    bloyta+V+Inf: bloyta
    bloyta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bloyttur
    bloyta+V+Sup: bloytt
    blómuprýða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: blómuprýðir
    blómuprýða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: blómuprýddu
    blómuprýða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: blómuprýddi
    blómuprýða+V+Inf: blómuprýða
    blómuprýða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: blómuprýddur
    blómuprýða+V+Sup: blómuprýtt
    blóðræna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: blóðrænir
    blóðræna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: blóðrændu
    blóðræna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: blóðrændi
    blóðræna+V+Inf: blóðræna
    blóðræna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: blóðrændur
    blóðræna+V+Sup: blóðrænt
    blóðtroyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: blóðtroytir
    blóðtroyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: blóðtroyttu
    blóðtroyta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: blóðtroytti
    blóðtroyta+V+Inf: blóðtroyta
    blóðtroyta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: blóðtroyttur
    blóðtroyta+V+Sup: blóðtroytt
    bløða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bløðir
    bløða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bløddu
    bløða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bløddi
    bløða+V+Inf: bløða
    bløða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bløddur
    bløða+V+Sup: bløtt
    borðklæða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: borðklæðir
    borðklæða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: borðklæddu
    borðklæða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: borðklæddi
    borðklæða+V+Inf: borðklæða
    borðklæða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: borðklæddur
    borðklæða+V+Sup: borðklætt
    borðreiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: borðreiðir
    borðreiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: borðreiddu
    borðreiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: borðreiddi
    borðreiða+V+Inf: borðreiða
    borðreiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: borðreiddur
    borðreiða+V+Sup: borðreitt
    boyggja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: boyggir
    boyggja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: boygdu
    boyggja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: boygdi
    boyggja+V+Inf: boyggja
    boyggja+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: boygdur
    boyggja+V+Sup: boygt
    boðsenda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: boðsendir
    boðsenda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: boðsendu
    boðsenda+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: boðsendi
    boðsenda+V+Inf: boðsenda
    boðsenda+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: boðsendur
    boðsenda+V+Sup: boðsent
    breiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: breiðir
    breiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: breiddu
    breiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: breiddi
    breiða+V+Inf: breiða
    breiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: breiddur
    breiða+V+Sup: breitt
    breyðføða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: breyðføðir
    breyðføða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: breyðføddu
    breyðføða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: breyðføddi
    breyðføða+V+Inf: breyðføða
    breyðføða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: breyðføddur
    breyðføða+V+Sup: breyðføtt
    broyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: broytir
    broyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: broyttu
    broyta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: broytti
    broyta+V+Inf: broyta
    broyta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: broyttur
    broyta+V+Sup: broytt
    bráðdoypa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bráðdoypir
    bráðdoypa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bráðdoyptu
    bráðdoypa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bráðdoypti
    bráðdoypa+V+Inf: bráðdoypa
    bráðdoypa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bráðdoyptur
    bráðdoypa+V+Sup: bráðdoypt
    bráðfrysta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bráðfrystir
    bráðfrysta+V+Inf: bráðfrysta
    bráðfrysta+V+Sup: bráðfryst
    bráðhvessa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bráðhvessir
    bráðhvessa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bráðhvestu
    bráðhvessa+V+Inf: bráðhvessa
    bráðkøla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bráðkølir
    bráðkøla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bráðkøldu
    bráðkøla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bráðkøldi
    bráðkøla+V+Inf: bráðkøla
    bráðkøla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bráðkøldur
    bráðkøla+V+Sup: bráðkølt
    bráðvenda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bráðvendir
    bráðvenda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bráðvendu
    bráðvenda+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bráðvendi
    bráðvenda+V+Inf: bráðvenda
    bráðvenda+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bráðvendur
    bráðvenda+V+Sup: bráðvent
    bræða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bræðir
    bræða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bræddu
    bræða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: bræddi
    bræða+V+Inf: bræða
    bræða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: bræddur
    bræða+V+Sup: brætt
    bróta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: brýtur
    bróta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: breyt
    bróta+V+Inf: bróta
    bróta+V+Sup: brotið
    brúka+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: brúkar
    brúka+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: brúktu
    brúka+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: brúkti
    brúka+V+Inf: brúka
    brúka+V+Sup: brúkt
    brýna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: brýnir
    brýna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: brýndu
